Utah statutes.
26-2-6.   Foundling certificates.

(1)  A foundling certificate shall be filed for each infant of unknown parentage found in the state.   The certificate shall be prepared and filed with the local registrar of the district in which the infant was found by the person assuming custody.

(2)  The certificate shall be filed within 10 days after the infant is found and is acceptable for all purposes in lieu of a certificate of birth.



Amended by Chapter 202, 1995 General Session

